Utah statutes.
63M-1-302.   Members -- Meetings -- Expenses.
(1) (a)  The board shall consist of 15 members appointed by the governor to
four-year terms of office with the consent of the Senate.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately
half of the board is appointed every two years.
(c)  The members may not serve more than two full consecutive terms except
where the governor determines that an additional term is in the best interest
of the state.
(2)  Not more than eight members of the board may be from one political party.
(3)  The members shall be representative of all areas of the state.
(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(5)  Eight members of the board constitute a quorum for conducting board
business and exercising board power.
(6)  The governor shall select one of the board members as its chair.
(7)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
